Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 413.650 is amended to read:
413.650. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dental care organization” means  a prepaid managed care health services organization, as
defined in ORS 414.025, that provides dental care to members of a coordinated care organization.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Veteran” means an individual who is a veteran,  as defined in ORS 408.225, except the in-
dividual may be discharged or released under honorable or other than honorable conditions.
(2) The Veterans Dental Program is established in  the Oregon Health Authority and shall be
administered in collaboration  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services. The purpose
of the program is to provide oral health care to eligible veterans who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The authority shall contract with dental  care organizations throughout this state and with
individual oral health care providers in areas of this state that are not served by dental care  or-
ganizations to provide oral health care to veterans enrolled in the Veterans Dental Program.
(4) Enrollees in the Veterans Dental Program shall receive the types  and extent of oral health
care services that the authority determines will be  provided to medical assistance recipients in ac-
cordance with ORS 414.065, without any corresponding copayments, deductibles  or cost sharing re-
quired.
(5) An individual is eligible for the Veterans Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is ineligible for medical assistance;
(c) Has income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Is a veteran.
(6) The authority shall:
(a) Prescribe by rule a simple application process for the Veterans Dental Program.
(b) Provide assistance, in person or by telephone, to applicants  for and enrollees in the program.
(c) Require and accept as verification of eligibility:
(A) Documentation demonstrating that an applicant’s income is at or below 400 percent  of the
federal poverty guidelines.
(B) An applicant’s federal DD Form 214 or 215.
(d) Require dental care organizations and  individual oral health care providers that con-
tract with the authority to provide oral health care to  veterans under this section to com-
Enrolled Senate Bill 230 (SB 230-B) Page 1
plete an intake screening with an enrollee within 60 days after the enrollee initiates contact
with the organization or provider.
SECTION 1a.
If House Bill 2211 becomes law,  section 1 of this 2025 Act (amending ORS
413.650) is repealed and ORS 413.650, as amended by section 5, chapter 252, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 2211), is amended to read:
413.650. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dental subcontractor”  and “medical assistance” have the meaning given those terms in ORS
414.025.
(b) “Veteran” means an individual who is a veteran, as  defined in ORS 408.225, except the in-
dividual may be discharged or released under honorable or other than honorable conditions.
(2) The Veterans Dental Program is established in  the Oregon Health Authority and shall be
administered in collaboration  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services. The purpose
of the program is to provide oral health care to eligible veterans who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The  authority shall contract with dental subcontractors throughout this state and with in-
dividual oral health care providers in areas of this state that are  not served by dental subcontrac-
tors to provide oral health care to veterans enrolled in the Veterans Dental Program.
(4) Enrollees in the Veterans Dental  Program shall receive the types and extent of oral health
care services that the authority determines will be  provided to medical assistance recipients in ac-
cordance with ORS 414.065, without  any corresponding copayments, deductibles or cost sharing re-
quired.
(5) An individual is eligible for the Veterans Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is ineligible for medical assistance;
(c) Has income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Is a veteran.
(6) The authority shall:
(a) Prescribe by rule a simple application process for the Veterans Dental Program.
(b) Provide assistance, in person or by telephone, to applicants  for and enrollees in the program.
(c) Require and accept as verification of eligibility:
(A) Documentation demonstrating  that an applicant’s income is at or below 400 percent of the
federal poverty guidelines.
(B) An applicant’s federal DD Form 214 or 215.
(d) Require dental subcontractors and  individual oral health care providers that contract
with the authority to provide oral health care to veterans under this section to  complete an
intake screening with an enrollee within 60 days after  the enrollee initiates contact with the
subcontractor or provider.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 230 (SB 230-B) Page 2
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 230 (SB 230-B) Page 3